Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.340

Military spouses—Agency responsibilities.

The agency responsible for educator certification shall, as set forth in chapter 18.340 RCW:

(1) Adopt rules for expedited professional certification for military spouses;

(2) Identify a contact or coordinator to assist military spouse applicants and licensees;

(3) Provide training to each board member on the culture of military spouses, the military spouse experience, and issues related to military spouse career paths; and

(4) Maintain a military spouse assistance web page.

[ 2023 c 165 s 7.]

NOTES:

Short title—Finding—Intent—2023 c 165: See notes following RCW 18.340.020.